en: ginkgo nuts
de: Ginkgosamen, Ginkgonüsse
fr: noix de gingko
hr: ginko orasi
it: noci di ginkgo
zh: 银杏果, 白果

en: hazelnut, hazelnuts, filbert, filberts
af: Haselneut
an: Avellana
ar: بندق
be: лясны арэх
bg: лешник, лешници
bn: হ্যাজেল বাদাম
ca: avellana, avellanes
cs: lískový ořech, lískové ořechy, lískové oříšky
da: Hasselnød, hasselnødder
de: Haselnuss, Haselnüsse, Haselnusse
el: φουντούκια
eo: Avelo
es: avellana, avellanas
et: sarapuupähkel, sarapuupähklid, sarapuupähkleid
eu: Hur
fa: فندق
fi: hasselpähkinä, hasselpähkinät
fr: noisette, noisettes
ga: cnónna coill
gl: Abelá
he: אגוז לוז
hr: lješnjak, lješnjaci, lešnjak, lješnjaka, lješnjake
ht: Nwazèt
hu: mogyoró
id: Kacang hazel
it: nocciola, nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツ
ko: 헤이즐넛
lb: Hieselnoss
lt: lazdynų riešutai, lazdyno riešutai
lv: lazdu rieksti
ms: Kacang hazel
mt: ġellewż
nb: hasselnøtt, hasselnøtter
ne: क‌‌‌टुस
nl: hazelnoot, hazelnoten
nv: Neeshchʼíínímazí
pl: orzechy laskowe, Leszczyna pospolita, orzech laskowy, orzechów laskowych, orzecha laskowego
pt: avelã, avelãs
ro: alune de pădure
ru: лесной орех, лесньым орехом, фундук
sk: lieskové oriešky
sl: lešniki
sq: lajthi
sv: hasselnöt, hasselnötter, hasselnöts
th: เฮเซลนัต
tr: fındık
uk: ліщинні горіхи
ur: بندق
vi: Hạt phỉ
zh: 榛子, 榛仁

en: Piedmont hazelnut, PGI Piedmont hazelnut
fr: noisette du Piémont, noisettes du Piémont
it: nocciola Piemonte

en: ground Piedmont hazelnut
fr: noisette du Piémont en poudre
it: polvere di nocciola Piemonte

en: Piedmont hazelnut paste
fr: pâte de noisette du Piémont
it: pasta di nocciola Piemonte

en: toasted hazelnuts
it: nocciole tostate

fr: noisettes décortiquées
de: Haselnusskerne
it: nocciole sgusciate
nb: hasselnøttkjerner
pt: miolo de avelã
ru: ядро ореха фундука

en: hazelnut kernel, hazelnut kernels
de: ganze Haselnüsse, Haselnüsse ganz
es: avellanas en grano
fr: noisettes entières
hr: lješnjak jezgra
it: nocciole intere
pt: avelã inteira, avelãs inteiras

fr: noisettes entières torréfiées
nl: hele gegrilde hazelnoten
pt: avelã inteira torrada, avelâs inteiras torradas, avelã inteira tostada, avelâs inteiras tostadas

en: chopped hazelnuts
it: nocciole tritate

en: roasted nibbed hazelnuts
de: geröstete und gehackte Haselnüsse, Haselnüsse geröstet und gehackt
fr: noisettes hachées grillées, noisettes hachées et grillées
hr: pečeni naribani lješnjaci
it: Nocciola rosolata tostata
nl: geroosterde gehakte hazelnoten
pl: siekane i prażone orzeszki laskowe

en: ground hazelnuts
it: nocciole macinate

fr: éclats de noisettes
de: Haselnusssplitter, Haselnussstücke
it: nocciole a scaglie

fr: éclats de noisettes caramélisés
fi: karamellisoidut hasselpähkinät

en: hazelnut paste, hazelnut butter
bg: лешникова паста, крем лешник
ca: pasta d'avellana, pasta d'avellanes
cs: lískooříšková pasta
da: hasselnøddepuré
de: Haselnussmus, Haselnüsspaste, Haselnusspaste, Haselnussmasse, Haselnussmark
es: pasta de avellana, pasta de avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinätahna, hasselpähkinämassa
fr: pâte de noisette, purée de noisettes
hr: pasta lješnjaka, pasta od lješnjaka, krema od lješnjaka, lješnjak pasta, lješnjakova pasta, lješnjak punjenje
hu: mogyoromassza
it: pasta di nocciole
nb: hasselnøttpasta, hasselnøtmasse
nl: hazelnootpasta
pl: pasta z orzechów laskowych
pt: pasta de avelã, pasta de avelãs
ro: pastă de alune de pădure
sk: oriešková pasta
sv: hasselnötspasta, hasselnötpasta, hasselnötsmassa

en: hazelnut paste with pieces of biscuits
es: pasta de avellana con trozos de galletas
fr: pâte à la noisette avec des morceaux de biscuits
hr: lješnjak punjenje s komadićima Digestive keksa
it: pasta di nocciole con pezzi di biscotti
nl: hazelnootpasta met stukjes koekjes

en: hazelnut filling
es: relleno de avellana
fr: garniture à la noisette
hr: punjenje od lješnjaka
it: ripieno di nocciole
nl: hazelnootvulling
pl: nadzienie z orzechów laskowych

en: hazelnut praline
de: Haselnuss-Praline
fi: hasselpähkinäpraliini
fr: praliné noisettes
hr: praline od lješnjaka
it: pralinato di nocciole, granella di nocciole
nl: hazelnootpraliné

en: nibbed and ground hazelnuts
de: Haselnüsse gesplittert und gemahlen, Haselnüsse gemahlen, gemahlene Haselnüsse
fr: éclats de noisettes et noisettes moulues
hr: naribane i mljevene lješnjake
it: nocciole tostate a scaglie
ru: ядро ореха фундука дробленое

en: macadamia nut, macadamia, Queensland nuts
ar: المكاداميا
bg: орехи макадамия, орехи Куинсленд
cs: makadamie
da: Macadamianød, queenslandnødder, macadamianødder
de: Makadamianuss, Macadamianüsse, Queenslandnüsse
el: καρύδια μακαντάμια, καρύδια Κουίνσλαντ
es: nueces macadamia, nueces de macadamia, nueces de Australia
et: makadaamiapähklid, makadaamiapähkleid
fi: macadamia-pähkinä, queensland-pähkinä, macadamia-pähkinät, queensland-pähkinät
fr: noix de macadamia, noix du Queensland
ga: cnónna macadaíme, cnónna Thír na Banríona
hr: makadamija orah
hu: makadámia, queenslandi dió
it: macadamia, noci macadamia, noci del Queensland
ja: マカダミアナッツ
lt: makadamijos, Kvinslendo riešutai
lv: makadāmijas, Kvīnslendas rieksti
mt: macadamia, Queensland nuts
nl: macadamianoot, macadamia, macadamianoten
nn: Makadamianøtter
pl: orzechy makadamia, orzechy Queensland
pt: macadâmia, nozes de macadâmia, nozes do Queensland
ro: nuci de macadamia, nuci de Queensland
ru: макадамия, орехи Куинсленд
sk: makadamové orechy, queenslandské orechy
sl: makadamija, orehi Queensland
sv: makadamianöt, Queenslandsnöt, macadamianöt
zh: 夏威夷果